Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2662.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 25, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 25-407.01, to read: START_STATUTE25-407.01. Parenting time hearings; domestic violence; abuse; expert witness testimony; qualifications; prohibition; applicability; definitions A. in any parenting time proceeding in which a parent is alleged to have committed domestic violence or abuse, the court may take testimony from an expert witness relating to the alleged domestic violence or abuse only if the expert witness has demonstrated both expertise and clinical experience in working with victims of domestic violence or abuse. The expertise and clinical experience may not include expertise and experience that is generated soleLy from serving as a court appointee in a parenting time proceeding or any related court proceeding. The demonstrated expertise of the expert witness may not be solely of a forensic nature. b. Psychological testing, principles, diagnoses and concepts that may be used by an expert witness under this section are limited to testing, principles, diagnoses and concepts that have been empirically established and generally accepted as valid and reliable for the parameters and conditions tested or the issues evaluated. c. The court may not allow evidence relating to polygraph examinations, voice-stress analysis or other psychological measures. D. Subsection A of this section does not apply to a law enforcement officer who has experience and training in recognizing domestic violence or abuse. E. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Abuse" has the same meaning prescribed in section 8-201. 2. "Domestic violence" has the same meaning prescribed in section 13-3601. 3. "Forensic" means any professional activity undertaken pursuant to a court order or for use in litigation, including the evaluation or treatment of a parent, child or other individual who is involved in a parenting time proceeding. END_STATUTE